lib/dict/lv_LV.aff
SFX h Y 161
SFX h   t   oða      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðâ      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðai     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðais    [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðajâ    [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðajai   [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðajam   [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðajâm   [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðajâs   [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðajiem  [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðajos   [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðam     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðâm     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðas     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðâs     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oði      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðie     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðiem    [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðo      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðos     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðs      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðu      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oðus     [^âçî]t
SFX h   çt   oða      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðâ      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðai     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðais    [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðajâ    [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðajai   [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðajam   [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðajâm   [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðajâs   [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðajiem  [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðajos   [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðam     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðâm     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðas     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðâs     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oði      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðie     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðiem    [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðo      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðos     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðs      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðu      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oðus     [ç]t
SFX h   ît   oða      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðâ      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðai     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðais    [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðajâ    [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðajai   [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðajam   [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðajâm   [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðajâs   [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðajiem  [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðajos   [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðam     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðâm     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðas     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðâs     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oði      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðie     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðiem    [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðo      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðos     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðs      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðu      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oðus     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   cît  koða      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðâ      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðai     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðais    [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðajâ    [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðajai   [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðajam   [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðajâm   [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðajâs   [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðajiem  [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðajos   [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðam     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðâm     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðas     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðâs     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koði      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðie     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðiem    [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðo      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðos     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðs      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðu      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koðus     [c]ît
SFX h   ît   oða      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðâ      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðai     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðais    [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðajâ    [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðajai   [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðajam   [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðajâm   [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðajâs   [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðajiem  [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðajos   [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðam     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðâm     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðas     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðâs     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oði      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðie     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðiem    [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðo      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðos     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðs      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðu      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oðus     [^d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goða      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðâ      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðai     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðais    [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðajâ    [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðajai   [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðajam   [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðajâm   [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðajâs   [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðajiem  [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðajos   [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðam     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðâm     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðas     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðâs     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goði      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðie     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðiem    [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðo      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðos     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðs      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðu      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goðus     [d]zît
SFX h   ât   oða      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðâ      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðai     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðais    [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðajâ    [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðajai   [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðajam   [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðajâm   [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðajâs   [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðajiem  [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðajos   [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðam     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðâm     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðas     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðâs     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oði      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðie     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðiem    [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðo      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðos     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðs      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðu      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oðus     [â]t
