lib/dict/lv_LV.dic
aizbikstît/I+b(MJhBC1
aizdarît/+dhgI[J(Bbc1M{C]
aizducinât/+b{(h}CcJI[MdBg1]
aizdîdît/BI+[hgb(c1J]d{MC
aizgurkstçt/+h(CMBJ1I
aizkasît/b+{MgIBJc(dh[1]C
aizkurinât/+bhBIC(JM1
aizlasît/g1+MbJIch{d(B[]C
aizmetinât/+bg(dhBI}1Jc{C[]M
aizpeldinât/+(1gbhcCBI[d{M]J}
aizplçnçt/+1CbBIh(MJ
aizraidît/+IMbJhB1(C
aizrâdît/+Ih(B1JbMC
aizskandinât/(+bhBICMJ1
aizslânît/+(JIBhMb1C
aizspert/+I(h6dB[5]
aizstatît/+bhgJd(I{1cBM][C
aizsçdçt/+bJIBcgh[dM{1]}
aiztîstît/1+(bIBhJMC
aizvilinât/+(bg[J]cBI{hdC}M1
aizèubinât/+BI1(hJ]d[}gb*&cMC{
aizğvîkstinât/1g+dBh(J[IbcM]{C}
aizğûstît/(+MIhBbJ1C
apart/eI+h(B84
apdauzît/hg+IcB*b1(Md&{J][C
apdâvinât/+hbCBI(J1M
apgrûtinât/B(IbM+hJ1C
apklabçt/1I+bJhC(MB
apkurkğíçt/+hM(bBI1CJ
aplocît/+hBb&J(*IM1
apmçdît/+hI(JbMBC1
appludinât/+(IhJbCBM1
aprasinât/h+bgJcC(1BI{M[d}]
apsaistît/+IbB(hM1JC
apslaucît/g+hdB{bI*[&(J1]M
apspîdinât/+(1bJIhMBC
apsvaidît/d+MbhgIB(cJ[]1{C
aptincinât/b+MhJBI(C1
apvaukğíçt/B(+IhJb1CM
apèabinât/+(hdgbIBcC1{[JM}]
apğíaudît/+&bIB(J*hMC1
apûjinât/b+hI(BJ1MC
atblisinât/bJ+(BI1Mdc{gh}[C]
atdimdçt/JC+(BIhb1M
atdârdinât/hC+(bIBJM1
atguldît/+c(hI1gb{J]BdM[C
atkasît/+]J(M1IB{cbd[hgC
atknakğíçt/(h+bIJBMC1
atkûpçt/+(hMJb1BIC
atmirkğíinât/+bdJ(ch1gB[I{}CM]
atplaukğíinât/hI(1+MbJBC
atpçkğíçt/+(JhIC1BbM
atritçt/+M1IBh(CJb
atskatît/b+1BIJ]g([hc{MdC
atspridzinât/BdhJ]b{I(1+cg[}CM
atsvaidzinât/b+{}hc(BgI1d[CMJ]
attrinkğíinât/+bBI1(hJCM
atvaïinât/+I1B(bJhCM
atzibçt/+IJ(1hCbBM
atèukstçt/(+BbIhM1CJ
atğvîkstinât/+b{g(dJ]Ich1B[CM}
atğûstît/c+BI(dhbg1J]{[CM
bagâtinât/+*hb(IBCJ1&M
bolît/gbI+{h(Bc]Jd1C[M
bûkğíçt/CM(bB+Jh1I
daudzinât/b+g{*dB[JhI&(1cMC]}
droğinât/gM+{bCdBhI(1*J&c[]}
dzimumaudzinât/+C(hbJIB1M
gaisinât/M+cIbJg1(d{[}hBC]
gribçt/+&([bg{Ic*hBd}M1J]C
ieaicinât/+Jh(1IBCMb
iebîdît/BdIc+g(hb{J]1MC[
iedipinât/+}hJM](IcbC1g[dB{
iedziïinât/+Jhb(BCI1M
ieguldinât/+bMdJCch1(BI}{g[]
iekaldinât/+[hbdBCc(1IMJg{]}
ieknakğíçt/cC+J([M}hbBdI1g{]
iekvçlinât/(+hcbd&*g{JIB1M}C[]
ielûrçt/+Jh(bIB1CM
iemîlçt/Ic+hbM(1Bg[{Jd]C}
ieplikğíinât/bh+(IJCBM1
ieputçt/+bhJIB(MC1
ierukğíçt/h+IbMcC(dB{Jg[}1]
ieslacinât/(+BI1bhJCM
iespaidît/+dBI[cJhg(b1{]MC
iestumdît/I+gbBd(hcJ[{M]1C
iesûtît/+BI1(hJbMC
ietupinât/+bI(hM1BJC
ievicinât/(+b{cdBIJ]1hCM[}g
iezvanît/J(b+IhdcMg[B1{C]
ieíert/d+(5Ih6B][
ieğíobît/(+MbJBIh1C
ieòudzçt/(+MhIB1bJC
izbalinât/+IhJBC(b1M
izcepinât/{b+}hdBC(]J[cIg1M
izdrebinât/+h}dB(gIc1{[JMb]C
izelpinât/+h}dBJ[I(1cb{gMC]
izgurkstçt/+J(bIChBM1
izkladzinât/b+J1(IBChM
izknikğíçt/(C+BbIhJ1M
izkvçpinât/+hJMc(bI1g{dBC}[]
izlipinât/+b{(gh}JcdB[IC1M]
izmudşinât/+(IBbMhJ1C
izpalîdzçt/+Ichb([}CJBd]Mg1{
izpluinît/+(cBbMgJ]h{d[1IC
izputçt/(+CbhIBMJ1
izredzçt/+hJbI(*&B1MC
izsausinât/M+I(Bdbc1ghC}J[]{
izslaucît/h+({bIJdB[gM1]
izspindzçt/b+1BI(hMJC
izstâvçt/+(cbhIB1JMgd}{C][
iztarkğíçt/+(h1IBJCbM
iztupçt/h+Bb(I1CJM
izvedinât/(+BI1dcbJh[}g{MC]
izzibinât/Ih+M1(JBbC
izèubinât/+hb(IBJMC1
izğaudît/+{bBd(chIJMg[]1C
izğïûkt/+I98M%h(J
jautrinât/CIBd+cbJ](h}Mg1{[
klabçt/I+hb(CBJM1
klusinât/+hb(1IMBJC
kraukğíçt/IB+J1hb(CM
kvçlinât/Mh+(*b&CIJ1B
lasît/+bg&I*(Bcdh{J1]C[M
lâpît/gb+Ih(cBd1{J]C[M
mirkğíinât/J(+hbM1ICB
mçìinât/+MhIdBCc[(bgJ}{1]
neatğïûcât/Ch
nepadegât/h
nesastâjât/h}
noaugt/9+IdB(8T[h}J]M4
nobrikğíçt/+BIbh(1MJC
nodancinât/+h}b(CIcJMg[B]d{1
nodraudçt/IBhb+(1JMC
nodârdinât/+1(BIhCbJM
nogramstît/Bb+(MhJI1C
noildzinât/+1(BIbchMJdg}]C[{
nokaustît/+g1cMbIhCB[(d]J{
noklunkğíçt/(+hMBbI1CJ
nokraukğíinât/(+bgBd{hM}c[J]IC1
nokârnît/g1+(bMdJcBhI{C[]
nolocît/B+Idhb1({[Jg]M
nomocît/+dBbI({hgJ[]1M
nonîcinât/+hJ(bBI1MC
noplivinât/[+Ig(h1Bcdb}MJ{C]
nopurinât/b+h(IBMCJ1
noraugât/h(+C
norîbçt/+(bIJMhCB1
noskraidît/h+Jb(cBIdMg{1][C
nosmaidît/1I+b(BJhMC
nospindzçt/(b1BIh+JMC
nostiprinât/+g*I(BcChM&Jbd{1][}
nosvaidît/bId+1gMch(BJ{[]C
notaupît/g(1B+IMch{bd[CJ]
notrupçt/h+b(BCIMJ1
novadît/I+dJ(chB{b[M1g]C
novizçt/+Bbh(IJMC1
nozvanît/b+dBc(hJ]I1g{M[C
noèukstçt/(B+hIbMC1J
noïogât/+(hC
noğíetinât/+Jh(MIBbC1
noòemt/(+hIdBJ[4M]
nîcinât/1gb(+hdBIcMJC{[}]
pabaudît/b+gdB{(cI1Ch[MJ]
pabuşinât/+bM(hIBCJ1
padaudzinât/b+J(1IBhCM
padurstît/+gbh(BIJc[{Md1]C
padçdçt/+BIhC(b1JM
pagraizît/J](+gbIB1[hMcd{C
pairdinât/+h(bIBJ1CM
paklabinât/+Jb(1IBhMC
paklîdinât/CB+Ib1(hJM
pakulstît/+(IhdgM[{cBbJ1C]
pakğíinât/(J+hcCbIBd{1gM[}]
palielinât/+IhMCb(JB1*&
pamanît/+hJ{IBb(d1gcMC][
pamânît/1+hBIJc(Mb{g[d]C
papilinât/+bh(BIJ1CM
papostît/hI+Bd(M1bc[J]{gC
papïerkğíçt/+dMBhI[1gbc{CJ]}
paritçt/(+bhBI1CMJ
paskaldît/+gIB(bhd[cJM1C]{
paslavinât/+(hJICBMb1
pasolît/(+{bIdBJgh[Mc1]C
paspîdçt/J+bhC(IB1M
pasusinât/+hJBI1(bMC
pasûdzçt/(+[{bJghc}dM]BI1C
patracinât/h+B(CbJI1M
patvarstît/+hJ][MBCc(Idbg1{
pavalstît/CB(+hbJdcI[{M1g]
pavârtît/Ihg+Mbd(c1B]JC{[
pazîdît/Bd+Ic(bhJ]g{M1[C
paèubinât/bh(+J*IB&C1M
paîdçt/+(JI1bhBMC
pağíaidît/+(bhdB1gIMJc{]C[
pağûpinât/+hbI(BM&*J1C
pieadît/+Ih1Bb(MJC
piededzinât/Ch+IJb(BM1
piedârdinât/+h(BM1ICJb
pieklaudzçt/(J+hIBbMC1
pielabinât/B+bIh(M1JC
piemânît/(c+Jbg*&hBdI{C1M[]
piepludinât/+bJ(BIhM1C
pierasinât/+bIhc}1g({B[JMdC]
piesavinât/+I(BhCJbM1
piesmalstît/bIB1+(hcgMd]J{[C
piestâvçt/+(bCBhI1JM
pietraipît/g+]J(cIdB1bh[M{C
piezvanît/b+Jg(hIB]Md[{cC1
pieğíirt/h+B(I65
plaiksnît/c+hJ]IB(b[1gdM{C
plîkğíinât/+J(bhBMI1C
putinât/bI+CchJ][Bd({1g}M
pârbaudît/b+d([h1gIBJMc]{C
pârdedzinât/+bdI([JCh1gMc{B}]
pârdzirdît/+b(hIJB1CM
pârgrozît/Bbh+JI(M1C
pârkarinât/(+b[gdhCc{J}M]1BI
pârkratît/+hbIc({J][dBg1MC
pârkûpçt/+bIBCJh(M1
pârmidzinât/+b(IhJMB1C
pârpilçt/+(hbBI1JMC
pârrakstît/hI[+c1gd{(J]bBMC
pârsaldinât/+BIb{hdc[J}(g]MC1
pârslavinât/h(+IBCbJM1
pârsprakğíçt/+hbIBCM(1J
pârstîdzçt/+(I1JbhBMC
pârtapinât/+d([cJ]IbM1gBh{C}
pârvaidçt/b+dBhcI[C({JgM]1}
pârvîstît/+b(cgdBh{I[J1M]C
pâríepinât/+bh(MIJB1C
pârğûstît/+(cbghMdIJ[]B{1C
raidît/+h(JbdBIM1c{]gC[
risinât/+gI1(BcdhMbC}[J]{
saadît/bBI1+hJ(MC
sabrucinât/+bhCcgJIB(M{d1]}[
sadauzît/+BdIJ]bg1(chM{C[
sadzeldinât/BJbM+h(IC1
sagrabinât/+(hMJIbB1C
saildzinât/+1JbhCM(IB
saklabçt/+bIBJh(1CM
saknapinât/+bg(h{cJ]IC[B1d}M
sakurkğíçt/b+1BI(hCJM
sakûpçt/+hJMb(1BIC
saluncinât/bcC+(hgI[}BJdM{]1
samitinât/d+bJh(1IBgMc{][C}
sanest/F+ehIJ8(M]}T
saplikğíinât/g+J*[bdcIh&M(BC1]{}
saputinât/hb+IB(1CJM
saraust/hJeIFT
sarîdît/B+bgdIc(hJ{][M1C
saskatît/+JIh(Bcb{[dgM]1C
saslîdçt/J+IbCB1(Mh
saspraudît/ICB(+hbMJ1
sastâvçt/Ib+chB1(Jdg}{]MC[
sasûrstçt/+IC(BhbJM1
satrunçt/(+IBhCbJM1
sausinât/+(bIBJh1CM
savârdzinât/+hcCdIbJ]g[(MB1}{
saârdît/b+(BIdJc]hgM{1[C
saíepinât/[hC}Jg+IbcM(d1{B]
sağíaudît/bBd+hI[{Jc(gM1C]
sağûpinât/+&hB(IbJ*1CM
skaitît/gbh+{Ic(J[1BM]dC
slacinât/+I(bhcg1dB{J}]M[C
smarşinât/CI+dB1(h[cgb]J{M}
spridzinât/h+(bdBJIg[{1CcM]}
stostît/bhJ+(c{BIgd1M[]C
sveicinât/h(cCg+IBbJ[dM]}{1
taisît/+M(cIgbd{J[1hBC]
tirdît/+IbcJ]h{(g1BCd[M
tupçt/(bBI+JMhC1
uzaicinât/+bhCcIg1(J[MBd]{}
uzbrikğíçt/Jb+(hIBC1M
uzdiençt/+h$()cIBHGgbJ]Cd1[{}Mp
uzdçstît/+hIbJ(M1BC
uzjautrinât/+bhJ(MCBI1
uzklunkğíinât/b{+BdJh}c(I[Mg]C1
uzkrekğíinât/+(]JIcMhbg{1BdC[}
uzkûpinât/hb+J(I1BMC
uzmirdzçt/J+B1IMbh(C
uzpeldçt/C+(hBI1bMJ
uzpukstçt/Bb+hJIC(1M
uzraudzît/hb+(gJI{Md][
uzsisinât/h+bd(1gBIcJ}][{MC
uzsludinât/Jh+CIMb(1B
uzspodrinât/+hIcg(BbCd&*{J1[M]}
uzstumdît/+I(hcJgdBb[]M{1C
uzsûtît/+(I1JhBMbC
uztvançt/Bb+IC(hJ1M
uzvedât/h+C}
uzzinât/Ib(B+JhC&*1M
uzíepinât/[hC}+BdJgbI(c1{M]
uzğíaidît/b+chdB(JgI{]MC1[
uzòaudçt/h+bMB1I(CJ
valbît/Ic(d+b[hB{gMCJ1]
vingrinât/(+dhb{}BJg]ICcM1[
vîdçt/b+BJhM1C
zîdît/+BdgbI(hc{J]M1C[
èubinât/M+b&*hI(JBC1
íçrkstçt/+C(JbIBMh1
ğíaidît/h+bBdI1(gJ{cM[]C
ğòukstçt/JBI+hbM(C1
şvadzçt/+I(JhBbC1M
